src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
# Regular expression to make the initial letter of any word optionally upper
# case, as in the beginning of a sentence.

а (->) А,
б (->) Б,
в (->) В,
г (->) Г,
д (->) Д,
е (->) Е,
ё (->) Ё,
ж (->) Ж,
з (->) З,
и (->) И,
й (->) Й,
к (->) К,
л (->) Л,
м (->) М,
н (->) Н,
о (->) О,
п (->) П,
р (->) Р,
с (->) С,
т (->) Т,
у (->) У,
ф (->) Ф,
х (->) Х,
ц (->) Ц,
ч (->) Ч,
ш (->) Ш,
щ (->) Щ,
ъ (->) Ъ,
ы (->) Ы,
ь (->) Ь,
э (->) Э,
ю (->) Ю,
я (->) Я,
ҥ (->) Ҥ || .#. ( 0 ) _ ;
